Utah statutes.
72-11-205.    Passenger ropeways -- Registration of ropeways.
(1)  A passenger ropeway may not be operated in this state unless it is
registered with the committee, except as provided in Subsections (2) and (3).
(2)  The initial application for registration of a passenger ropeway permits
the operator to operate the passenger ropeway until final action on the
application is taken by the committee.
(3)  If an operator files an application to renew registration of a passenger
ropeway, then the operator may continue the operation of the passenger ropeway
under the existing registration until the committee takes final action on the
pending application and has:
(a)  issued a certificate to the operator; or
(b)  given written notice to the operator that the passenger ropeway has not
qualified for certification.
